Hawaii statutes.
[§622-59] Health care data discovery.
Where health care data submitted to either a public or private organization for
the purpose of aggregate treatment outcomes, trends, or cost analysis, or
public reporting, that identifies or reasonably could be used to identify
specific physicians, health care professionals, or individual patients, that
portion of the data shall not be subject to discovery or admission into
evidence in any civil or administrative proceeding involving the organization.
Information, documents, or records made in the regular course of business by a
hospital or other provider of health care are not to be construed as immune
from discovery or use in any civil or administrative proceeding merely because
they were presented to an organization for aggregate analysis. [L 1995, c 190,
§2]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next